Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-453
Methamphetamine; retailer education program.

The Nebraska State Patrol may develop and maintain a program to inform retailers about illicit methamphetamine production, distribution, and use in Nebraska and devise procedures and forms for retailers to use in reporting to the patrol suspicious purchases, thefts, or other transactions involving any products under the retailers' control which contain ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine, or ephedra. Reporting under this section shall be voluntary. Retailers reporting information to the patrol in good faith shall be immune from civil liability.

Laws 2001, LB 113, § 6.